SpellChecking/SpellCheckingTests/bin/Debug/Dictionaries/chuvash.aff
SFX G Y 263
SFX G 0 етĕп/RT [^ӳе]
SFX G ӳ ĕветĕп/RT ӳ
SFX G 0 тĕп/RT е
SFX G 0 местĕп/RT .
SFX G 0 етĕн/RT [^ӳе]
SFX G ӳ ĕветĕн/RT ӳ
SFX G 0 тĕн/RT е
SFX G 0 местĕн/RT .
SFX G 0 ет/RT [^ӳе]
SFX G ӳ ĕвет/RT ӳ
SFX G 0 т/RT е
SFX G 0 мест/RT .
SFX G 0 етпĕр/RT [^ӳе]
SFX G ӳ ĕветпĕр/RT ӳ
SFX G 0 тпĕр/RT е
SFX G 0 местпĕр/RT .
SFX G 0 етĕр/RT [^ӳе]
SFX G ӳ ĕветĕр/RT ӳ
SFX G 0 тĕр/RT е
SFX G 0 местĕр/RT .
SFX G 0 еççĕ [^ӳе]
SFX G ӳ ĕвеççĕ ӳ
SFX G 0 ççĕ е
SFX G 0 меççĕ .
SFX G 0 еетĕп/RT [^ӳе]
SFX G ӳ ĕвеетĕп/RT ӳ
SFX G 0 етĕп/RT е
SFX G 0 ейместĕп/RT [^ӳе]
SFX G ӳ ĕвейместĕп/RT ӳ
SFX G 0 йместĕп/RT е
SFX G 0 еетĕн/RT [^ӳе]
SFX G ӳ ĕвеетĕн/RT ӳ
SFX G 0 етĕн/RT е
SFX G 0 ейместĕн/RT [^ӳе]
SFX G ӳ ĕвейместĕн/RT ӳ
SFX G 0 йместĕн/RT е
SFX G 0 еет/RT [^ӳе]
SFX G ӳ ĕвеет/RT ӳ
SFX G 0 ет/RT е
SFX G 0 еймест/RT [^ӳе]
SFX G ӳ ĕвеймест/RT ӳ
SFX G 0 ймест/RT е
SFX G 0 еетпĕр/RT [^ӳе]
SFX G ӳ ĕвеетпĕр/RT ӳ
SFX G 0 етпĕр/RT е
SFX G 0 ейместпĕр/RT [^ӳе]
SFX G ӳ ĕвейместпĕр/RT ӳ
SFX G 0 йместпĕр/RT е
SFX G 0 еетĕр/RT [^ӳе]
SFX G ӳ ĕвеетĕр/RT ӳ
SFX G 0 етĕр/RT е
SFX G 0 ейместĕр/RT [^ӳе]
SFX G ӳ ĕвейместĕр/RT ӳ
SFX G 0 йместĕр/RT е
SFX G 0 ееççĕ/RT [^ӳе]
SFX G ӳ ĕвееççĕ/RT ӳ
SFX G 0 еççĕ/RT е
SFX G 0 еймеççĕ/RT [^ӳе]
SFX G ӳ ĕвеймеççĕ/RT ӳ
SFX G 0 ймеççĕ/RT е
SFX G 0 ĕп/RT [^ӳеи]
SFX G 0 йĕп/RT и
SFX G е ĕп/RT е
SFX G ӳ ĕвĕп/RT ӳ
SFX G 0 мĕп/RT .
SFX G 0 ĕн/RT [^ӳеи]
SFX G 0 йĕн/RT и
SFX G е ĕн/RT е
SFX G ӳ ĕвĕн/RT ӳ
SFX G 0 мĕн/RT .
SFX G 0 еймĕн/RT [^еиӳ]
SFX G 0 ймĕн/RT е
SFX G ӳ ĕвеймĕн/RT ӳ
SFX G 0 ĕ/R [^ӳеи]
SFX G 0 йĕ/R и
SFX G е ĕ/R е
SFX G ӳ ĕвĕ/R ӳ
SFX G 0 мĕ/R . 
SFX G 0 ĕпĕр/RT [^еӳи]
SFX G 0 йĕпĕр/RT и
SFX G е ĕпĕр/RT е
SFX G ӳ ĕвĕпĕр/RT ӳ
SFX G 0 мĕпĕр/RT .
SFX G 0 ĕр/RT [^еӳ]
SFX G ĕ ĕр/RT е
SFX G ӳ ĕвĕр/RT ӳ
SFX G 0 мĕр/RT .
SFX G 0 ĕç/T [^еиӳ]
SFX G е ĕç/T е
SFX G 0 йĕç/T и
SFX G ӳ ĕвĕç/T ӳ
SFX G 0 мĕç/TR .
SFX G 0 рĕм/RT [^лрн]
SFX G 0 тĕм/RT [лрн]
SFX G 0 мерĕм/RT .
SFX G 0 рĕн/RT [^лрн]
SFX G 0 тĕн/RT [лрн]
SFX G 0 мерĕн/RT .
SFX G 0 рĕ/RT [^лрн]
SFX G 0 чĕ/T [лрн]
SFX G 0 мерĕ/RT .
SFX G 0 рĕмĕр/RT [^лрн]
SFX G 0 тĕмĕр/RT [лрн]
SFX G 0 мерĕмĕр/RT .
SFX G 0 рĕр/RT [^лрн]
SFX G 0 тĕр/RT [лрн]
SFX G 0 мерĕр/RT .
SFX G 0 рĕç/T [^лрн]
SFX G 0 чĕç/T [лрн]
SFX G 0 мерĕç/T .
SFX G 0 еттĕм/RT [^еӳ]
SFX G 0 ттĕм/RT е
SFX G ӳ ĕветтĕм/RT ӳ
SFX G 0 местĕм/RT .
SFX G 0 еттĕн/RT [^еӳ]
SFX G 0 ттĕн/RT е
SFX G ӳ ĕветтĕн/RT ӳ
SFX G 0 местĕн/RT .
SFX G 0 етчĕ/T [^еӳ]
SFX G 0 тчĕ/T е
SFX G ӳ ĕветчĕ/T ӳ
SFX G 0 местчĕ/T .
SFX G 0 еттĕмĕр/RT [^еӳ]
SFX G 0 ттĕмĕр/RT е
SFX G ӳ ĕветтĕмĕр/RT ӳ
SFX G 0 местĕмĕр/RT .
SFX G 0 еттĕр/RT [^еӳ]
SFX G 0 ттĕр/RT е
SFX G ӳ ĕветтĕр/RT ӳ
SFX G 0 местĕр/RT .
SFX G 0 етчĕç/T [^еӳ]
SFX G 0 тчĕç/T е
SFX G ӳ ĕветчĕç/T ӳ
SFX G 0 местчĕç/T .
SFX G 0 сеттĕм/RT .
SFX G 0 сеттĕн/RT .
SFX G 0 сеччĕ/T .
SFX G 0 сеттĕмĕр/RT .
SFX G 0 сеттĕр/RT .
SFX G 0 сеччĕç/T .
SFX G 0 ĕттĕм/RT [^ӳе]
SFX G ӳ ĕвĕттĕм/RT ӳ
SFX G е ĕттĕм/RT е
SFX G 0 меттĕм/RT .
SFX G 0 ĕттĕн/RT [^ӳе]
SFX G ӳ ĕвĕттĕн/RT ӳ
SFX G е ĕттĕн/RT е
SFX G 0 мĕттĕн/RT .
SFX G 0 ĕччĕ/T [^ӳе]
SFX G ĕ ĕвĕччĕ/T ӳ
SFX G е ĕччĕ/T е
SFX G 0 мĕччĕ/T .
SFX G 0 ĕттĕмĕр/RT [^ӳе]
SFX G ӳ ĕвĕттĕмĕр/RT ӳ
SFX G е ĕттĕмĕр/RT е
SFX G 0 мĕттĕмĕр/RT .
SFX G 0 ĕттĕр/RT [^ӳе]
SFX G ӳ ĕвĕттĕр/RT ӳ
SFX G е ĕттĕр/RT е
SFX G 0 мĕттĕр/RT .
SFX G 0 ĕччĕç/T [^ӳе]
SFX G ӳ ĕвĕччĕç/T ӳ
SFX G е ĕччĕç/T е
SFX G 0 мĕччĕç/T .
SFX G 0 ĕпин [^ӳеи]
SFX G ӳ ĕвĕпин ӳ
SFX G 0 йĕпин и
SFX G е ĕпин е
SFX G 0 мĕпин .
SFX G 0 ĕсĕн [^ӳеи]
SFX G ӳ ĕвĕсĕн ӳ
SFX G 0 йĕсĕн и
SFX G е ĕсĕн е
SFX G 0 мĕсĕн .
SFX G 0 ин/R [^ӳеи]
SFX G ӳ ĕвин/R ӳ
SFX G 0 йин/R и
SFX G е ин е
SFX G 0 мин/RT .
SFX G 0 ĕпĕрин/T [^ӳеи]
SFX G ӳ ăвăпăрин/T ӳ
SFX G е ĕпĕрин е
SFX G 0 йĕпĕрин и
SFX G 0 мĕпĕрин .
SFX G 0 ĕсĕр/T [^ӳеи]
SFX G ӳ ĕвĕсĕр/T ӳ
SFX G 0 йĕсĕр/T и
SFX G е ĕсĕр/T е
SFX G 0 мĕсĕр/T .
SFX G 0 ĕçин [^ӳеи]
SFX G 0 йĕçин и
SFX G ӳ ĕвĕçин ӳ
SFX G е ĕçин е
SFX G 0 мĕçин .
SFX G 0 ем/RT [^ӳе]
SFX G ӳ ĕвем/RT ӳ
SFX G 0 м/RT е
SFX G 0 тĕр/RT .
SFX G 0 ер/R [^ӳе]
SFX G ӳ ĕвер/R ӳ
SFX G 0 р/R е
SFX G 0 ĕр/T [^ӳе]
SFX G ӳ ĕвĕр/T ӳ
SFX G е ĕр/T е
SFX G 0 ччĕр/T .
SFX G 0 ме/T .
SFX G 0 месĕр/T .
SFX G 0 мешкĕн/T .
SFX G 0 екен/B [^еӳ]
SFX G 0 екенсем/P [^еӳ]
SFX G 0 кен/B е
SFX G 0 кенсем/P е
SFX G ӳ ĕвекен/B ӳ
SFX G ӳ ĕвекенсем/P ӳ
SFX G 0 ни/BT .
SFX G 0 нисем/P .
SFX G 0 менни/BT .
SFX G 0 меннисем/P .
SFX G 0 мелли/BRT .
SFX G 0 меллисем/P .
SFX G 0 есси/BRT [^еӳ]
SFX G 0 ессисем/P [^еӳ]
SFX G 0 сси/BRT е
SFX G 0 ссисем/P е
SFX G ӳ ĕвесси/BRT ӳ
SFX G ӳ ĕвессисем/P ӳ
SFX G 0 ес/RT [^еӳ]
SFX G 0 с/RT е
SFX G ӳ ĕвес/RT ӳ
SFX G 0 есле/T [^еӳ]
SFX G 0 сле/T е
SFX G ӳ ĕвесле/T ӳ
SFX G 0 есшĕн/RT [^еӳ]
SFX G 0 сшĕн/RT е
SFX G ӳ ĕвесшĕн/RT ӳ
SFX G 0 нĕ/RT .
SFX G 0 нĕшĕн/T .
SFX G 0 нĕрен/T .
SFX G 0 мелле/RT .
SFX G 0 ен/RT [^еӳ]
SFX G 0 н/RT е
SFX G ӳ ĕвен/RT ӳ
SFX G 0 се/RT .
SFX G 0 сен/T .
SFX G 0 сессĕн/T .
SFX G 0 месен/T .
SFX G 0 месессĕн/T .
SFX G 0 е [^еӳ]
SFX G ӳ ĕве ӳ
SFX G 0 иччен/T [^еӳ]
SFX G е иччен/T е
SFX G ӳ ĕвиччен/T ӳ
SFX G 0 миччен/T .
SFX G 0 мессерен/T .
SFX G 0 нĕçемĕн/T .
SFX G 0 мен/RT .
SFX G 0 меншĕн/T .
SFX G 0 еймен/RT [еӳ]
SFX G 0 ймен/RT е
SFX G ӳ ăвеймен/RT ӳ
SFX G 0 ейменшĕн/T [еӳ]
SFX G 0 йменшĕн/T е
SFX G ӳ ăвейменшĕн/T ӳ
